Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.415

Delivery without governor's warrant.

A law enforcement agency shall deliver a person in custody to the accredited agent or agents of a demanding state without the governor's warrant provided that:

(1) Such person is alleged to have broken the terms of his or her probation, parole, bail, or any other release of the demanding state; and

(2) The law enforcement agency has received from the demanding state an authenticated copy of a prior waiver of extradition signed by such person as a term of his or her probation, parole, bail, or any other release of the demanding state and photographs or fingerprints or other evidence properly identifying the person as the person who signed the waiver.

[ 2001 c 264 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 264: See note following RCW 9A.76.110.